District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.05

Transfers.

(a)

All positions, personnel, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available to the Department of Public Works for transportation and other functions, as set forth in section III(A), III(B), III(C), III(D) (not including supply and fuel distribution), III(E), III(F) (not including the ensuring proper and sanitary collection and disposal of refuse in an environmentally sound manner), III(H) (not including parking enforcement, and vehicle and driver licensing, registration, and control), III(I) (including only streets and bridges), III(J) (not including the control of building systems and the provision of repair and improvement services), and III(L) of Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1983 Add (part D of subchapter VI of Chapter 15 of Title 1, D.C. Official Code), effective March 1, 1984 are hereby transferred to the DDOT.

(b)

All of the functions assigned and authorities delegated to the Department of Public Works, with respect to transportation and other functions, as set forth in section III(A), III(B), III(C), III(D) (not including supply and fuel distribution), III(E), III(F) (not including ensuring proper and sanitary collection and disposal of refuse in an environmentally sound manner), III(H) (not including parking enforcement, and vehicle and driver licensing, registration, and control), III(I) (including only streets and bridges), III(J) (not including the control of building systems and the provision of repair and improvement services), and III(L) of Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1983 are hereby transferred to the DDOT.

(c)

All of the functions of the Department of Public Works as set forth in section IV (A) of Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1983 are hereby transferred to the DDOT.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 6, 49 DCR 3444
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 77(b), 52 DCR 2638

History

D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “DDOT” for “DOT”.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) enactment, see § 6022 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6102 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).

Emergency Legislation

Short title: Section 6021 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that subtitle C of title VI of the act may be cited as the “Civilian School Crossing Guard Function Transfer Amendment Act of 2007”.

Short title: Section 6101 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle K of title VI of the act may be cited as the “School Crossing Guard Promotion Opportunity Amendment Act of 2010”.

Short Title

Civilian crossing guards: Section 6022 of D.C. Law 17-20, as amended by section 6102 of D.C. Law 18-223, provided:

“(a) The authority to employ civilian crossing guards to perform the function of providing safe conduct of children traveling to and from school granted to the Chief of Police is transferred to the District Department of Transportation.

“(b) The Chief of Police shall transfer to the District Department of Transportation all employees, personal property, full-time equivalent position authority, assets, records, and all unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available relating to civilian crossing guards performing the function of providing safe conduct of children traveling to and from school.

“(c) The time-in-grade restrictions of section 838 of Chapter 8B of Title 6 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (6-B DCMR § 838) shall not apply to any civilian crossing guard, as defined by this section, for the purpose of being promoted to the position of civilian Traffic Control Officer.”

Editor's Notes